Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Powers

48-248-201. Powers.

Except as provided in subsection (b) or otherwise limited by this chapter, a PLLC has the powers enumerated in § 48-212-101.

A PLLC may be a promoter, general partner, member, associate or manager of a partnership, joint venture, trust or other entity only if the entity is engaged solely in rendering professional services or in carrying on business authorized by the PLLC's articles.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-202. Rendering of professional services.

A domestic or foreign LLC may render professional services in this state only through individuals licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to render the services.

Subsection (a) does not:

Require an individual employed by a PLLC to be licensed to perform services for the PLLC if a license is not otherwise required;

Prohibit a licensed individual from rendering professional services in the individual's individual capacity, although the individual is a member, manager, employee or agent of a domestic or foreign PLLC; or

Prohibit an individual licensed in another state from rendering professional services for a domestic or foreign PLLC in this state, if not prohibited by the licensing authority.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-203. Professions and other business allowed to be rendered.

A PLLC may not render any professional service or engage in any business other than the professional service and business authorized by its articles.

Subsection (a) does not prohibit a PLLC from investing its funds in real estate, mortgages, securities or any other type of investment.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.